el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ για τη συσκευή κατασκευής διακοσμητικών χειροτεχνίας.: Περιλαμβάνεται θήκη μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνονται κασέτες; Περιλαμβάνεται εργαλείο καθαρισμού; Περιλαμβάνεται εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Περιλαμβάνεται πακέτο αναπλήρωσης; Περιλαμβάνονται αρχικά αναλώσιμα; Περιλαμβάνονται πρότυπα; Άλλο
cs: Obsažené příslušenství výrobce kreativních dekorací: Včetně přenosného pouzdra; Včetně kazet; Včetně čisticího nástroje; Včetně návodu k použití; Včetně náhradní náplně; Včetně startovací sady spotřebního materiálu; Včetně šablon; Ostatní
fi: Mukana tulevat askartelukoristeiden valmistustarvikkeet: Sisältää kantolaukun; Sisältää kasetit; Sisältää puhdistustyökalun; Sisältää ohjekirjan; Sisältää täyttöpakkauksen; Sisältää aloitustarvikkeet; Sisältää mallit; Muu
sv: Tillbehör Maker Craft ingår: Bärväska ingår; Patroner ingår; Rengöringsverktyg ingår; Bruksanvisning ingår; Påfyllningsförpackning ingår; Startförbrukningsartiklar ingår; Mallar ingår; Övrigt
zh-TW: 手作裝飾製作工具隨附配件: 含攜帶盒; 含墨水匣; 含清潔工具; 含說明書; 含補充包; 含入門耗材; 含範本; 其他
it: Accessori Maker di decorazioni Craft inclusi: Custodia per il trasporto inclusa; Cartucce incluse; Strumento per la pulizia incluso; Manuale di istruzioni incluso; Confezione di ricarica inclusa; Materiali di consumo base inclusi; Modelli inclusi; Altro
zh-CN: 手工装饰制作工具配件: 包含便携包; 包含卡带; 包含清洁工具; 包含说明书; 包含补充包; 包含初学者耗材; 包含模板; 其他
sk-SK: S príslušenstvom zariadenia na výrobu ozdobných dekorácií: Vrátane prenosného puzdra; Vrátane náplní; Vrátane nástroja na čistenie; Vrátane návodu na použitie; Vrátane náhradného balenia; Vrátane štartovacieho spotrebného materiálu; Vrátane šablón; Iné
es: Accesorios incluidos con la máquina de decoración para manualidades: Estuche de transporte incluido; Cartuchos incluidos; Herramienta de limpieza incluida; Manual de instrucciones incluido; Paquete de repuestos incluido; Consumibles de inicio incluidos; Plantillas incluidas; Otro
hr-HR: Pribor za izradu ukrasa za rukotvorine uključen: Uključena torbica za nošenje; Uključeni ulošci; Uključen alat za čišćenje; Uključen priručnik s uputama; Uključeno pakiranje za punjenje; Uključen početni potrošni materijal; Uključeni predlošci; Ostalo
hu: Kézműves dekorációkészítő tartozékai: Hordozótáskával; Patronokkal; Tisztítóeszközzel; Használati útmutatóval; Utántöltő csomaggal; Kezdő fogyóeszközökkel; Sablonokkal; Egyéb
nl: Accessoires inbegrepen voor decoratiemaker voor knutselen: Inclusief draagtas; Inclusief cartridges; Inclusief reinigingstool; Inclusief handleiding; Inclusief navulverpakking; Inclusief startverbruiksartikelen; Inclusief templates; Overige
fr: Accessoires inclus pour machine de décoration créative: Étui de transport inclus; Cartouches incluses; Outil de nettoyage inclus; Manuel d’instructions inclus; Pack de recharge inclus; Consommables de démarrage inclus; Modèles inclus; Autre
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za orodje za izdelavo okraskov: Vključen kovček za prenašanje; Vključene kartuše; Vključeno orodje za čiščenje; Vključena navodila za uporabo; Vključeno pakiranje za polnjenje; Vključen začetni potrošni material; Vključene predloge; Drugo
pl: Akcesoria dołączone do urządzenia do tworzenia dekoracji rękodzielniczych: Torba w zestawie; Wkłady w zestawie; Narzędzie do czyszczenia w zestawie; Instrukcja obsługi w zestawie; Pakiet uzupełniający w zestawie; Zestaw startowy materiałów w zestawie; Szablony w zestawie; Inne
de: Im Basteldekorationsgerät enthaltenes Zubehör: Inklusive Tragetasche; Inklusive Kartuschen; Inklusive Reinigungswerkzeug; Inklusive Bedienungsanleitung; Inklusive Nachfüllpackung; Inklusive Verbrauchsmaterial für den Start; Inklusive Vorlagen; Andere
vi: Phụ kiện máy làm đồ trang trí thủ công đi kèm: Kèm hộp đựng; Kèm hộp mực; Kèm công cụ vệ sinh; Kèm sách hướng dẫn; Kèm vật tư nạp lại; Kèm bộ vật tư tiêu hao ban đầu; Kèm biểu mẫu; Khác
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse cu realizatorul de decorațiuni artizanale: Geantă de transport inclusă; Cartușe incluse; Instrument de curățare inclus; Manual de instrucțiuni inclus; Pachet de rezervă inclus; Consumabile de start incluse; Șabloane incluse; Altele
ja: CraftデコレーションMaker用アクセサリー付き: キャリングケース付き; カートリッジ付き; クリーニングツール付き; 取扱説明書付き; 詰め替えパック付き; スターター消耗品付き; テンプレート付き; その他
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่มีมาให้ในชุดของเครื่องทำของตกแต่งงานฝีมือ: มาพร้อมกระเป๋าใส่; มาพร้อมตลับ; มาพร้อมเครื่องมือทำความสะอาด; มาพร้อมคู่มือการใช้งาน; มาพร้อมแพ็กรีฟิล; มาพร้อมวัสดุสิ้นเปลืองสำหรับเริ่มต้น; มาพร้อมเทมเพลต; อื่นๆ
en: Craft decoration maker accessories included: Carrying case included; Cartridges included; Cleaning tool included; Instruction manual included; Refill pack included; Starter consumables included; Templates included; Other
tr: Dâhil el işi dekorasyon üreticisi aksesuarları: Taşıma çantası dahil; Kartuşlar dahil; Temizleme aleti dahil; Kullanım kılavuzu dahil; Yedek paket dahil; Başlangıç sarf malzemeleri dahil; Şablonlar dahil; Diğer
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за машина за декоративни проекти: Включен калъф за носене; Включени касети; Включен инструмент за почистване; Включено ръководство за употреба; Включен пакет с консумативи за презареждане; Включени стартови консумативи; Включени шаблони; Други
da: Tilbehør til håndlavet dekoration, der medfølger: Bæretaske medfølger; Patroner medfølger; Rengøringsværktøj medfølger; Brugsanvisning medfølger; Genopfyldningspakke medfølger; Startforbrugsmaterialer medfølger; Skabeloner medfølger; Andet
nb: Håndarbeidslagertilbehør inkludert: Bæreveske inkludert; Kassetter inkludert; Rengjøringsverktøy inkludert; Bruksanvisning inkludert; Refillpakke inkludert; Startforbruksmateriell inkludert; Maler inkludert; Annet
ko: 공예 장식 제작기 포함 액세서리: 휴대용 케이스 포함; 카트리지 포함; 청소 도구 포함; 사용 설명서 포함; 리필 팩 포함; 스타터 소모품 포함; 템플릿 포함; 기타
pt-BR: Acessórios incluídos com o aparelho para decoração artesanal: Estojo de transporte incluído; Cartuchos incluídos; Ferramenta de limpeza incluída; Manual de instruções incluído; Pacote de refil incluído; Consumíveis iniciais incluídos; Modelos incluídos; Outros
ru: Аксессуары в комплекте устройства для создания украшений: Чехол для переноски в комплекте; Картриджи в комплекте; Инструмент для очистки в комплекте; Руководство по эксплуатации в комплекте; Запасной блок в комплекте; Стартовый набор расходников в комплекте; Шаблоны в комплекте; Другое
lt-LT: Įtraukti dekoracijų kūrimo įrenginio aksesuarai: Pridedamas nešiojimo dėklas; Pridedamos kasetės; Pridedamas valymo įrankis; Pridedama naudojimo instrukcija; Pridedama papildymo pakuotė; Pridedamos pradinės eksploatacinės medžiagos; Pridedami šablonai; Kita
pt-PT: Acessórios da máquina de criação de decorações incluídos: Estojo de transporte incluído; Cartuchos incluídos; Ferramenta de limpeza incluída; Manual de instruções incluído; Embalagem de recarga incluída; Consumíveis iniciais incluídos; Modelos incluídos; Outro